Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.180

Officers protected from civil liability.

No sheriff or other officer shall be liable to a civil action for obeying any writ of habeas corpus or order of discharge made thereon.

[Code 1881 s 681; 1877 p 140 s 684; 1869 p 158 s 621; 1854 p 214 s 449; RRS s 1079.]